North Carolina, session 2025, SB323.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Student Health and
Responsibility Act."

PART II. SAFER SEX SUPPLIES GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) Definitions. – The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Applicable administering entity. – As follows:
a. For constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, the
Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.
b. For community colleges, the State Board of Community Colleges.
c. For public school units, the Department of Public Instruction.
*S323-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Eligible entity. – Constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina,
community colleges, and public school units.
(3) Safer sex supplies. – Supplies that help promote safe sexual encounters,
including condoms and lubricants.
SECTION 2.(b) Program Established. – There is established the Safer Sex Supplies
Grant Program (Program) for the 2025-2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-2028 fiscal years. The
Program shall expire June 30, 2028. The Program shall be administered separately by the Board
of Governors of The University of North Carolina for constituent institutions of The University
of North Carolina, the State Board of Community Colleges for community colleges, and the
Department of Public Instruction for high schools in public school units. The purpose of the
Program is to reduce health care costs and support student success by assisting eligible entities
that are grant recipients to provide free access for students to safer sex supplies at constituent
institutions of The University of North Carolina, community colleges, and high schools located
in public school units.
SECTION 2.(c) Grant Applications. – An eligible entity may submit an application
to the applicable administering entity for a grant pursuant to this section for each year the
Program is in effect. The application shall identify at least the following:
(1) Current and ongoing needs for safer sex supplies and estimated costs
associated with those needs.
(2) A plan to do at least the following:
a. Offer free safer sex supplies in designated locations on campus,
including student health centers, residence halls, guidance counselor
offices, and offices of athletic coaches.
b. Replenish supplies as needed based on student usage.
c. Maintain student privacy and dignity to foster responsible decision
making and self-sufficiency.
d. Partner with campus organizations, student health groups, community
organizations, health care providers, local health departments,
nonprofit organizations, and private sector entities to facilitate
distribution and awareness campaigns for the Program, including
securing in-kind contributions of safer sex supplies.
e. Establish at each eligible entity receiving funds a Student Health
Advisory Committee consisting of student body leaders, health
professionals, and faculty advisors. The Committee would oversee
implementation of the grant funds, assess student engagement, and
recommend improvements.
f. Continue to provide safer sex supplies to students without grant funds
after the expiration of the Program.
SECTION 2.(d) Administration of Grants; Award of Funds. – Each applicable
administering entity shall develop appropriate criteria and guidelines for selecting grant
recipients and administering the grants pursuant to this section, including at least the following:
(1) Prioritizing the selection of grant recipients based on applications that
demonstrate economic benefits, collaboration, and cost efficiency.
(2) Allocating funds to an eligible entity that receives an award on the basis of
enrollment.
SECTION 2.(e) Use of Funds. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, including G.S. 115C-81.30(e), eligible entities receiving grant funds pursuant to this
section shall do the following:
(1) Provide free safer sex supplies to students in accordance with the application
submitted by the eligible entity pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
Page 2 Senate Bill 323-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Refrain from requiring parental permission for students to access safer sex
supplies, including for students enrolled in high school in a public school unit.
SECTION 2.(f) Collaboration. – Each applicable administering entity shall
collaborate with the other applicable administering entities and eligible entities receiving grant
funds, to the extent possible, to share best practices and coordinate outreach efforts.
SECTION 2.(g) Supplement Not Supplant. – Grants provided pursuant to the
Program shall be used to supplement and not to supplant State or non-State funds already
provided for safer sex supplies.
SECTION 2.(h) Administrative Costs. – Of the funds appropriated to each
applicable administering entity by this act for the grants provided in this section, the applicable
administering entity may retain a total of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in each
fiscal year for administrative costs associated with the Program.
SECTION 2.(i) Program Report. – No later than April 1 of each fiscal year in which
funds are awarded pursuant to this section, each applicable administering entity shall report on
the Program to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services. The report shall include at least the
following information:
(1) The identity of each eligible entity that received grant funds through the
Program.
(2) The amount of funding received by each entity identified pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The safer sex supplies purchased with grant funds by each entity that received
a grant and rates of student usage of those supplies.
(4) The overall impact of the Program, including at least the following
information:
a. Projected health care savings rates.
b. Regional effectiveness of the Program.
(5) Recommendations to expand or modify the Program, taking into account
cost-effectiveness and the impact of the Program on public health.

PART III. APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund the sum of nine million
six hundred thousand dollars ($9,600,000) in nonrecurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium to provide grants to public high schools and public institutions of higher
education in accordance with the Safer Sex Supplies Grant Program established pursuant to
Section 2 of this act and to be allocated in each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium as
follows:
(1) Three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,750,000) to the Board
of Governors of The University of North Carolina.
(2) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) to the Community Colleges System Office.
(3) Two million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,850,000) to the
Department of Public Instruction.
SECTION 3.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($750,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of seven
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
do all of the following in relation to the Safer Sex Supplies Grant Program (Program) authorized
by Section 2 of this act:
(1) Coordinate with applicable administering entities and eligible entities
receiving grant funds under the Program to ensure consistent messaging,
Senate Bill 323-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
foster public awareness, and promote informed and responsible decision
making by students.
(2) Provide technical assistance, data monitoring, and other related support to
eligible entities receiving funds under the Program and to local health
departments that collaborate with eligible entities.
(3) Collaborate with local health departments and student groups to provide
guidance on the prevention of sexually transmitted infections, the benefits of
preventive care, and related workforce impact analysis.
SECTION 3.(c) The funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall not revert at
the end of each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium but shall instead remain available
until June 30, 2028.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 4 Senate Bill 323-First Edition